Mississippi, session 2026, HB1812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Legislature finds that state-supported community colleges serve large and diverse student populations and face increasing challenges related to behavioral threats, campus violence and crisis response. The Legislature further finds that early identification and assessment of potential threats, when conducted using both empirically and evidence-based standardized methods, can prevent acts of violence, distinguish between credible and noncredible threats, reduce unnecessary disciplinary actions, and protect the safety and well-being of students, faculty, staff and the public.  It is therefore the intent of the Legislature in this act to provide funding to establish a pilot program at the state-supported community colleges to provide those colleges with modern tools and resources necessary to implement consistent, defensible and effective behavioral threat assessment and violence-prevention practices. SECTION 2. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Community College Board for the purpose of defraying the expenses associated with the implementation of a behavioral threat assessment and violence-prevention pilot program at the state-supported community colleges, in accordance with Sections 3 through 5 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ................................................. $ 1,450,000.00 SECTION 3.  The funds appropriated by this act shall be allocated by the Mississippi Community College Board to the state-supported community colleges.  Such funds shall be used by the colleges for the acquisition and implementation of evidence-based behavioral threat screening and assessment platforms, training and onboarding of institutional personnel, integration with existing campus safety and student support systems, and ongoing technical support and compliance documentation necessary to maintain a standardized and defensible threat assessment process. The colleges shall coordinate their implementation efforts with campus police, student affairs offices, counseling and mental health services, and other appropriate personnel to ensure effective use of the program. SECTION 4.  The Mississippi Community College Board shall maintain complete accounting and programmatic records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated by this act and shall administer the pilot program in a manner consistent with existing fiscal control laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 5.  Not later than December 1, 2027, the Mississippi Community College Board shall submit a report to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Universities and Colleges Committees and the House and Senate Appropriations Committees.  Such reports shall summarize the use of funds appropriated by this act, the number of participating community colleges, aggregate information regarding program utilization, observed impacts on campus safety and crisis response, and any recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program. SECTION 6.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.